Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6412.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 256b. (1) A person that violates section 256a(1) is subject to the following: (a) For a first violation, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (2) A person that violates section 256a(2) is subject to the following: (a) For a first violation, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (3) A person that violates section 256a(3) is subject to the following: (a) For a first violation, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (4) A person that violates section 256a(5) is subject to the following: (a) For a first violation, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, the person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6411 (request no. H07393'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.